Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-5653
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act:

(1) Approved medical specialty means family practice, general practice, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, general surgery, obstetrics/gynecology, and psychiatry;

(2) Approved dental specialty means general practice, pediatric dentistry, and oral surgery;

(3) Approved mental health practice program means an approved educational program consisting of a master's or doctorate degree with the focus being primarily therapeutic mental health and meeting the educational requirements for licensure in mental health practice or psychology by the department;

(4) Commission means the Nebraska Rural Health Advisory Commission;

(5) Department means the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services;

(6) Doctorate-level mental health student means a graduate student enrolled in or accepted for enrollment in an approved mental health practice program leading to a doctorate degree and meeting the educational requirements for licensure in psychology by the department;

(7) Full-time practice means a minimum of forty hours per week;

(8) Health care means both somatic and mental health care services;

(9) Master's level mental health student means a graduate student enrolled in or accepted for enrollment in an approved mental health practice program leading to a master's degree and meeting the educational requirements for licensure in mental health practice by the department;

(10) Office means the Office of Rural Health;

(11) Part-time practice means less than full-time practice but at least twenty hours per week;

(12) Qualified educational debts means government and commercial student-loan loans obtained by students for postsecondary education tuition, other educational expenses, and reasonable living expenses, as determined by the department, but does not include loans received under the act; and

(13) Rural means located within any county in Nebraska having a population of less than fifteen thousand inhabitants and not included within a metropolitan statistical area as defined by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 573, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 56;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 727;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 48;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 153;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 80;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 101;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 54;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 625;

Laws 2015, LB196, § 3.
August 30, 2015.The Nebraska Medical Student Assistance Act, sections 71-5613 to 71-5645, was repealed by Laws 1991, LB 400, § 26.